Maryland, session 2026, HB1211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
11–114.
(g) (1) Subject to the applicable coverage specified under subsection (a)(1) of
this section, any portion of the common elements and the units, exclusive of improvements
and betterments installed in the units by unit owners other than the developer, damaged
or destroyed shall be repaired or replaced promptly by the council of unit owners unless:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1211*

HOUSE BILL 1211
(i) The condominium is terminated;
(ii) Repair or replacement would be illegal under any State or local
health or safety statute or ordinance; or
(iii) 80 percent of the unit owners, including every owner of a unit or
assigned limited common element which will not be rebuilt, vote not to rebuild.
(2) (i) 1. [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE cost of repair or replacement in excess of insurance proceeds
and reserves is a common expense.
2. A property insurance deductible is not a cost of repair or
replacement in excess of insurance proceeds.
(ii) If the cause of any damage to or destruction of any portion of the
condominium originates from the common elements or an event outside of the condominium
units and common elements, the council of unit owners’ property insurance deductible is a
common expense.
(iii) [1.] If the cause of any damage to or destruction of any portion
of the condominium originates from a unit, the owner of the unit where the cause of the
damage or destruction originated is responsible for the [council of unit owners’ property
insurance deductible not to exceed $10,000] FULL COST OF REPAIR OR REPLACEMENT
OF THE DAMAGED OR DESTROYED PORTION OF THE CONDOMINIUM.
[2.] (IV) The council of unit owners shall inform each unit
owner annually in writing of:
1. THE UNIT OWNER’S RESPONSIBILITY FOR THE FULL
COST OF REPAIR OR REPLACEMENT FOR DAMAGE OR DESTRUCTION THAT
ORIGINATED FROM THE OWNER’S UNIT; AND
2. A. The unit owner’s responsibility for A PORTION OF
the council of unit owners’ property insurance deductible IF DAMAGE OR DESTRUCTION
OF ANY PORTION OF THE CONDOMINIUM ORIGINATES FROM THE COMMON
ELEMENTS OR AN EVENT OUTSIDE THE CONDOMINIUM; and
B. The amount of the deductible.
[3. The council of unit owners’ property insurance deductible
amount exceeding the $10,000 responsibility of the unit owner is a common expense.]
[(iv)] (V) In the same manner as provided under § 11–110 of this
title, the council of unit owners may make an annual assessment against the unit owner
responsible under subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph.

HOUSE BILL 1211 3
(3) (I) If the DAMAGE OR DESTRUCTION TO A PORTION OF THE
CONDOMINIUM ORIGINATED FROM THE COMMON ELEMENTS OR AN EVENT OUTSIDE
THE CONDOMINIUM AND THE damaged or destroyed portion of the condominium is not
repaired or replaced:
[(i)] 1. The insurance proceeds attributable to the damaged
common elements shall be used to restore the damaged area to a condition compatible with
the remainder of the condominium;
[(ii)] 2. The insurance proceeds attributable to units and limited
common elements which are not rebuilt shall be distributed to the owners of those units
and the owners of the units to which those limited common elements were assigned; and
[(iii)] 3. The remainder of the proceeds shall be distributed to all
the unit owners in proportion to their percentage interest in the common elements.
(II) IF THE DAMAGE OR DESTRUCTION OF A PORTION OF THE
CONDOMINIUM ORIGINATED IN A UNIT AND THE DAMAGED OR DESTROYED PORTION
OF THE CONDOMINIUM IS NOT REPAIRED OR REPLACED:
1. THE DAMAGED OR DESTROYED AREA SHALL BE
RESTORED TO A CONDITION COMPATIBLE WITH THE REMAINDER OF THE
CONDOMINIUM; AND
2. THE OWNER OF THE UNIT WHERE THE DAMAGE OR
DESTRUCTION ORIGINATED IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE COST TO RESTORE THE
DAMAGED AREA.
(4) (i) If the unit owners vote not to rebuild any unit, that unit’s entire
common element interest, votes in the council of unit owners, and common expense liability
are automatically reallocated upon the vote as if the unit had been condemned under §
11–112 of this title, and the council of unit owners promptly shall prepare, execute, and
record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations.
(ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, § 11–123 of
this title governs the distribution of insurance proceeds if the condominium is terminated.
(i) The provisions of this section do not apply to a condominium all of whose units
are intended for nonresidential use.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.